Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF59.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [121A.036] SAFE SCHOOLS TRANSPARENCY; REPORTING. new text end new text begin (a) A school principal or school board designee must provide teachers and each student's parents with timely notice of violent activity occurring on school grounds or at school-sponsored activities in which one or more individuals suffer injuries. The notice must state whether the school is aware of videos or recordings of such violent activity. Notice must also be provided to teachers and parents when a dangerous weapon is brandished or confiscated. The notice must not contain names or identifying characteristics of any students involved in the activity. "Timely notice" means notice within 24 hours, if practicable, and no later than 48 hours after an incident. The notice must be delivered to an email address or mobile application from which a parent has consented to receive such notices. If a parent has not provided this contact information, the school may choose another delivery method or none. new text end new text begin (b) A charter school or school district is prohibited from engaging in retaliatory action against a teacher or other school employee for reporting, discussing, or publicizing incidents of school violence or dangerous conduct. A school or school district must not retaliate against an employee for participating in an investigation, hearing, or inquiry regarding school and classroom safety. Nothing in this section waives a student's data privacy rights under federal and state law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2025-2026 school year and later. new text end